North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 23B. Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice.

§ 120-209.
Creation and membership of Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice.

The Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice is established. The Committee consists of 14 members as follows:

Seven members of the Senate appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, at least two of whom are members of the minority party.

Seven members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, at least two of whom are members of the minority party.

Terms on the Committee are for two years and begin on the convening of the General Assembly in each odd-numbered year, except that initial appointments begin on the date of appointment. Members may complete a term of service on the Committee even if they do not seek reelection or are not reelected to the General Assembly, but resignation or removal from service in the General Assembly constitutes resignation or removal from service on the Committee.

A member continues to serve until a successor is appointed. A vacancy shall be filled within 30 days by the officer who made the original appointment.

History.

2015-245, s. 15.

§ 120-209.1.
Purpose and powers of Committee.

The Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice shall examine budgeting, financing, administrative, and operational issues related to the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs administered by the Department of Health and Human Services.

The Committee may make periodic reports, including recommendations, to a regular session of the General Assembly on issues related to Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs.

History.

2015-245, s. 15.

§ 120-209.2.
Organization of Committee.

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each designate a cochair of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice. The Committee shall meet upon the joint call of the cochairs.

A quorum of the Committee is eight members. No action may be taken except by a majority vote at a meeting at which a quorum is present.

Members of the Committee receive subsistence and travel expenses, as provided in

G.S. 120-3.1

. The Committee may contract for consultants or hire employees in accordance with

G.S. 120-32.02

. The Legislative Services Commission, through the Legislative Services Officer, shall assign professional staff to assist the Committee in its work. Upon the direction of the Legislative Services Commission, the Directors of Legislative Assistants of the Senate and of the House of Representatives shall assign clerical staff to the Committee. The expenses for clerical employees shall be borne by the Committee.

The Committee cochairs may establish subcommittees for the purpose of examining issues relating to its Committee charge.

History.

2015-245, s. 15.

§ 120-209.3.
Additional powers.

The Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice, while in discharge of official duties, shall have access to any paper or document and may compel the attendance of any State official or employee before the Committee or secure any evidence under

G.S. 120-19

. In addition,

G.S. 120-19

.1 through

G.S. 120-19.4

shall apply to the proceedings of the Committee as if it were a joint committee of the General Assembly.

History.

2015-245, s. 15.

§ 120-209.4.
Reports to Committee.

Whenever the Department of Health and Human Services, or any division within the Department, is required by law to report to the General Assembly or to any of its permanent, study, or oversight committees or subcommittees on matters relating to the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs, the Department shall transmit a copy of the report to the cochairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice.

History.

2015-245, s. 15.